District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.10

Application of chapter to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of the District exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this chapter, under other law of the District relating to a support order, or recognizing a foreign support order, may receive evidence from outside the District pursuant to § 46-353.16, communicate with a tribunal outside the District pursuant to § 46-353.17, and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside the District pursuant to § 46-353.18. In all other respects, subchapters III through VI of this chapter [§§ 46-353.01 through § 46-356.16] do not apply, and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 210, 63 DCR 222